projects/m-basic-np/m-basic.lexc
!Multichar_Symbols +n +pn +sg +pl +num +case +acc +nom +1 +%0 +agr +tense +past +pres

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
PNoun ;
Verb ;
Det ;

LEXICON Noun

spy   NCat;
cat   NCat;
city  NCat;
fox   NCat;
panic NCat;
try   NCat;
watch NCat;

LEXICON PNoun

john PNCat;
mary PNCat;

LEXICON NCat

+n:0 NNum;

LEXICON PNCat

+pn+sg+num:0 NCase;

LEXICON NNum
+sg+num:0 NCase;
+pl+num:^s NCase;

LEXICON NCase

+acc+case:0 #;
+nom+case:0 #;

LEXICON Verb

talk  VCat;
walk  VCat;
like  VCat;
beg   VCat;
make  VCat;
panic VCat;
try   VCat;
watch VCat;

LEXICON VCat

+v:0 VInf;
+v:0 #;

LEXICON VInf

+%0+agr+pres+tense:0  #;
+1+agr+pres+tense:^s  #;
+%0+agr+past+tense:^ed #;

LEXICON Det

the   DCat;

LEXICON DCat

+D:0 #;
